Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Article 1. In General
§ 11-34-124.
Interest on defaulted payments and unpaid taxes; agreement to pay;
insurance required; use of proceeds; foreclosure permitted.

Every borrower shall
pay interest on defaulted payments at a rate to be determined by the
board not to exceed a ten percent (10%) annual percentage rate. By
express covenant in his mortgage deed the borrower shall agree to
pay when due all interest, taxes, liens, judgments, assessments and
insurance lawfully assessed against the mortgaged land. Taxes, liens,
judgments, assessments or insurance not paid when due and paid by
the mortgagee become a part of the mortgage debt and shall bear interest
at a rate to be determined by the board not to exceed a ten percent
(10%) annual percentage rate. Every borrower shall insure buildings
on the lands mortgaged to the satisfaction of the board. Insurance
shall be made payable to the mortgagee as its interest may appear
at the time of loss, and at the option of the mortgagee subject to
the general regulations of the board. Insurance proceeds received
may be used to pay for reconstruction of the buildings destroyed.
Nothing in this section shall prevent the commencement of foreclosure
proceedings at any time upon the default of principal or interest
or failure to pay any taxes, judgments, assessments, liens or insurance.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 118, § 18; 1931, ch. 44, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 41-118; Laws 1935, ch. 119, § 1; 1937, ch. 52, § 1; 1939, ch. 23, § 1; 1943, ch. 16, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 21-118; W.S. 1957, § 11-635; W.S. 1977, § 11-39-127; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1983, ch. 158, § 1.

§ 11-34-125.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1980,
ch. 49, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1921, ch. 118, § 26, related to books and records of the Wyoming farm loan board.

§ 11-34-126.
Exemption of property of board from taxation; exceptions.

Except as otherwise provided by subsection (b) of this section, all mortgages, real estate and other property owned by the board is exempt from all general taxes, state, county and municipal. For the purpose of this act the board is deemed to be the owner of any property from the date it is bid in by the board at a foreclosure sale.

If the board becomes the owner of the real estate and other property before the fourth Monday in June of the current year, it shall be liable for any property taxes lawfully assessed against the property, except for any taxes imposed under W.S.

21-13-102

,

21-13-201

and

21-13-303

. The county assessor shall list and assess the property for taxation purposes, and the state loan and investment board shall pay any tax due for the year in its entirety prior to December 31 of that year and any other year in which the board owns the property. If redemption is made of the property at any time during the year in which the state loan and investment board has paid the property taxes due, the person redeeming the property shall be liable to the state loan and investment board for any taxes paid. There is appropriated from the loss reserve account as provided by W.S.

11-34-202

to the state loan and investment board a sum sufficient to pay the property taxes authorized by this section.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 118, § 27; 1929, ch. 92, § 8; R.S. 1931, § 41-127; C.S. 1945, § 21-127; W.S. 1957, § 11-637; W.S. 1977, § 11-39-129; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1997, ch. 74, § 1; 1998, ch. 13, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Practitioner's Guide to Valuation and Assessment Appeals of State and Local Assessed Property,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 173 (1997).

§ 11-34-127.
Surety bonds; generally.

Whenever a bond or undertaking
is required by this act or by the board to be given, it shall be held
to mean a surety bond furnished by a surety company authorized and
qualified to do business in this state. Such bonds shall run to the
state loan and investment board and the form thereof shall be approved
by the attorney general.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 118, § 29; R.S. 1931, § 41-129; C.S. 1945, § 21-131; W.S. 1957, § 11-638; W.S. 1977, § 11-39-130; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1998, ch. 13, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-34-101(a)(iv).

§ 11-34-128.
Surety bonds; payment of cost.

The cost of surety bonds
provided by this act, furnished by the officers or employees of said
board, shall be a part of the general expense of the administration
and paid by the board.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 118, § 30; R.S. 1931, § 41-130; C.S. 1945, § 21-132; W.S. 1957, § 11-639; W.S. 1977, § 11-39-131; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-34-101(a)(iv).

§ 11-34-129.
Investment
of permanent funds.

The state treasurer,
with the approval of the board, is directed to invest and keep invested
in farm loans a sum not to exceed two hundred seventy-five million
dollars ($275,000,000.00) of any state permanent funds available for
investment, including loans already made and outstanding, as the funds
become available in the treasurer’s office for investment in loans
approved by the board.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 118, § 31; 1923, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 6; 1925, ch. 86, § 4; 1927, ch. 110, § 1; 1931, ch. 77, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 41-131; C.S. 1945, § 21-133; W.S. 1957, § 11-640; Laws 1961, ch. 128, § 1; 1967, ch. 62, § 1; 1969, ch. 177, § 1; 1971, ch. 18, § 1; 1973, ch. 221, § 1; ch. 245, § 3; 1975, ch. 40, § 1; 1976, ch. 8, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 11-39-132; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1983, ch. 158, § 1; 1984, ch. 30, § 1; 1985, ch. 178, § 1; 2000, ch. 65, § 2; 2008, ch. 113, § 2.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, deleted the former last sentence which read: “The limitation on legislatively designated investments under W.S.

9-4-712

applies to this investment.”

§ 11-34-130.
Trespass upon lands owned by board prohibited; penalties.

Whoever knowingly and
willfully commits a trespass upon lands owned by the board or upon
lands mortgaged to the board, either by cutting down or destroying
or carrying away any timber or wood standing or growing thereon or
by grazing, mowing, cutting or removing any hay, grass or growing
or matured crops thereon or who, without right, injures or removes
any building, fence, improvements or other property belonging or appertaining
to the lands, or unlawfully occupies, plows or cultivates any of the
land, or aids or abets any trespass or injury, is guilty of a misdemeanor
and shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) or more
than five hundred dollars ($500.00), imprisoned not less than thirty
(30) days or more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 92, § 9; R.S. 1931, § 41-134; C.S. 1945, § 21-128; W.S. 1957, § 11-643; W.S. 1977, § 11-39-133; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Severability. —

Section 10, ch. 92, Laws 1929, reads: “If any section, subsection, sentence, clause or phrase of this act is for any reason held to be unconstitutional, such decision shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of the act.”

§ 11-34-131.
Wyoming
transportation enterprise account; use thereof.

The transportation enterprise account is established to be used by the state loan and investment board to finance transportation projects of benefit to the general public as defined in this section. The transportation enterprise account shall be administered by the state loan and investment board, subject to recommendation and appropriation by the legislature, for the purpose of fostering transportation investments in projects of benefit to the general public within the state. The state loan and investment board shall:

Adopt rules and regulations to implement the purposes of this section, considering other funds available including department of transportation funds; and

Distribute funds to eligible grantees only, pursuant to appropriation of funds from the transportation enterprise fund by the legislature, subsection (c) of this section, federal requirements and rules and regulations of the state loan and investment board.

The transportation enterprise account shall receive monies from mineral royalty payments as provided in W.S. 9-4-607(a). All repayments of principal and interest to the state in connection with loans made under this section shall be deposited into the transportation enterprise account.

The board may make grants or loans to public entities for the purpose of enhancing transportation in this state. Eligible uses of the monies in the fund shall include capital investments for public transportation and improvement and maintenance of airline service and facilities.

In adopting rules and regulations under paragraph (a)(i) of this section, the board shall provide for the allocation of funds for capital investments for public transportation and for purposes eligible under subsection (c) of this section, with investment income received under W.S. 9-4-607(b) being allocated to purposes eligible under subsection (c) of this section.

The state loan and investment board shall annually audit the transportation trust fund created under W.S. 9-4-607(a) to determine the effects of inflation on investment earnings.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 201, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment

effective July 1, 2005, added the first sentence in (a); in (a) and (b) thrice substituted “account” for “fund under W.S. 9-4-204(a)(xiv)” or “fund”; and substituted “W.S. 9-4-607(a)” for “W.S. 9-4-204(a)(xv)” in (e).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”